Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-244
Upland game birds, defined.

Upland game birds means all species and subspecies of quail, partridges, pheasants, wild turkeys, and grouse, including prairie chickens.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 54.